en: Portafilters
xx: Portafilters
cs: Filtry do kávovarů
da: Filterholdere
de: Siebträger
es: Portafiltros
fr: Porte-filtres
it: Portafiltri
ja: ポータフィルター
nl: Filterdragers
no: Portafiltre
pl: Portafiltry
pt: Porta-filtros
ru: Портафильтры
sv: Portafilter
tr: Portafiltreler

en: Cooktop\, Oven & Range Accessories
xx: Cooktop\, Oven & Range Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro varné desky\, plotny a vařiče
da: Tilbehør til komfurer\, kogeplader og ovne
de: Zubehör für Herdplatten\, Backöfen und Küchenherde
es: Accesorios para placas de cocción\, hornos y cocinas de gas
fr: Accessoires pour plaques de cuisson\, fours et cuisinières
it: Accessori per fornelli\, forni e fuochi
ja: コンロ/オーブン/レンジ用品
nl: Accessoires voor kookplaten\, ovens en fornuizen
no: Tilbehør til platetopper\, ovner og komfyrer
pl: Akcesoria do płyt kuchennych\, piekarników i kuchenek
pt: Cooktop\, forno e acessórios para cozinhar
ru: Принадлежности для плит\, варочных поверхностей и духовок
sv: Hällar\, ugn och spis
tr: Set Üstü\, Fırın ve Ocak Aksesuarları

en: Cotton Candy Machine Accessories
xx: Cotton Candy Machine Accessories
cs: Stroje na cukrovou vatu – příslušenství
da: Candyflossmaskine – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Zuckerwattemaschinen
es: Accesorios para máquina de algodón dulce
fr: Accessoires pour machines à barbe à papa
it: Accessori macchina zucchero filato
ja: 綿菓子メーカー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor suikerspinmachines
no: Tilbehør til sukkerspinnmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do maszyn do waty cukrowej
pt: Acessórios para máquina de algodão doce
ru: Принадлежности для автоматов для приготовления сладкой ваты
sv: Tillbehör till maskiner för spunnet socker
tr: Pamuk Şeker Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Deep Fryer Accessories
xx: Deep Fryer Accessories
cs: Fritézy – příslušenství
da: Frituregryde – tilbehør
de: Fritteusenzubehör
es: Accesorios para freidoras
fr: Accessoires pour friteuses
it: Accessori frittura
ja: フライヤー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor frituurpannen
no: Tilbehør til frityrkokere
pl: Akcesoria do frytownic
pt: Acessórios para fritadeira
ru: Принадлежности для фритюрниц
sv: Fritöstillbehör
tr: Fritöz Aksesuarları

en: Dishwasher Parts & Accessories
xx: Dishwasher Parts & Accessories
cs: Myčky – příslušenství
da: Opvaskemaskine – tilbehør
de: Spülmaschinenzubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas de lavavajillas
fr: Pièces et accessoires pour lave-vaisselle
it: Componenti e accessori per lavastoviglie
ja: 食器洗浄機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vaatwasmachines
no: Tilbehør og deler til oppvaskmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do zmywarek
pt: Acessórios para lava-louças
ru: Детали и принадлежности для посудомоечных машин
sv: Diskmaskinstillbehör
tr: Bulaşık Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Electric Kettle Accessories
xx: Electric Kettle Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro rychlovarné konvice
da: Tilbehør til elkedler
de: Zubehör für Wasserkocher
es: Accesorios para hervidores de agua
fr: Accessoires pour bouilloires électriques
it: Accessori per cucine elettriche
ja: 電子ポット用品、電子ケトル用品
nl: Accessoires voor waterkokers
no: Tilbehør til vannkokere
pl: Akcesoria do czajników elektrycznych
pt: Acessórios para chaleiras elétricas
ru: Принадлежности для электрических чайников
sv: Tillbehör för elgrytor
tr: Elektrikli Su Isıtıcısı Aksesuarları

en: Electric Skillet & Wok Accessories
xx: Electric Skillet & Wok Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k remoskám a elektrickým pánvím wok
da: Tilbehør til elektriske pander og wokke
de: Zubehör für elektrische Pfannen & Woks
es: Accesorios para sartenes y woks eléctricos
fr: Accessoires pour woks et poêlons électriques
it: Accessori per wok e padelle elettriche
ja: 電気グリルパン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor elektrische koekenpannen en wokken
no: Tilbehør til elektriske stekepanner og wok
pl: Akcesoria do patelni i woków elektrycznych
pt: Acessórios para panela wok e frigideira elétricas
ru: Принадлежности для электрических кастрюль и воков
sv: Tillbehör till elektriska stekpannor och wokkar
tr: Elektrikli Tava ve Wok Aksesuarları

en: Fondue Set Accessories
xx: Fondue Set Accessories
cs: Sady na fondue – příslušenství
da: Fonduesæt – tilbehør
de: Fonduesetzubehör
es: Accesorios para juegos de fondue
fr: Accessoires pour fondues
it: Accessori per set di fondue
ja: フォンデュセット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor fonduesets
no: Tilbehør til fondysett
pl: Akcesoria do zestawów do fondue
pt: Acessórios para conjuntos de fondue
ru: Принадлежности для наборов для фондю
sv: Tillbehör till fondueset
tr: Fondü Seti Aksesuarları

en: Cooking Gel Fuels
xx: Cooking Gel Fuels
cs: Hořlavé pasty pro ohřev jídla
da: Gelbaseret brændstof til madlavning
de: Chafing Dish- & Fonduebrennpasten
es: Combustible en gel para cocinar
fr: Gels combustibles de cuisine
it: Pasta combustibile da fondue
ja: 調理用ジェル状着火剤
nl: Brandpasta
no: Gelbrennstoff til matlaging
pl: Paliwa w żelu
pt: Combustíveis em gel para culinária
ru: Горючие гели для фондю
sv: Bränngel för matlagning
tr: Jel Pişirme Yakıtları

en: Fondue Forks
xx: Fondue Forks
cs: Vidličky na fondue
da: Fonduegafler
de: Fonduegabeln
es: Tenedores para fondue
fr: Fourchettes à fondue
it: Forchette da fondue
ja: フォンデュ用フォーク
nl: Fonduevorken
no: Fondygafler
pl: Widelce do fondue
pt: Garfos de fondue
ru: Вилки для фондю
sv: Fonduegafflar
tr: Fondü Çatalları

en: Fondue Pot Stands
xx: Fondue Pot Stands
cs: Stojany na nádoby na fondue
da: Fonduegryde – stativ
de: Fonduetopfständer
es: Soporte para ollas de fondue
fr: Supports pour fondues
it: Supporti per scodelle da fondue
ja: フォンデュ鍋用スタンド
nl: Fonduepanhouders
no: Stativer til fondygryter
pl: Stojaki do garnków do fondue
pt: Suportes para panela de fondue
ru: Подставки для горшков для фондю
sv: Ställ för fonduegrytor
tr: Fondü Tenceresi Ayaklıkları

en: Food Dehydrator Accessories
xx: Food Dehydrator Accessories
cs: Sušičky potravin – příslušenství
da: Tørreovn til mad – tilbehør
de: Dörrautomatenzubehör
es: Accesorios para deshidratadores de alimentos
fr: Accessoires pour déshydrateurs alimentaires
it: Accessori essiccazione cibo
ja: 食品乾燥機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor voedsel drogen
no: Tilbehør til mattørkere
pl: Akcesoria do suszarek do żywności
pt: Acessórios para desidratar alimentos
ru: Принадлежности для установок для сушки продуктов
sv: Tillbehör till matdehydrering
tr: Yiyecek Kurutucu Aksesuarları

en: Food Dehydrator Sheets
xx: Food Dehydrator Sheets
cs: Listy do sušiček potravin
da: Tørreovn til mad – ark
de: Dörrautomatenbleche
es: Láminas para deshidratadores de alimentos
fr: Feuilles pour déshydrateurs alimentaires
it: Buste essiccazione cibo
ja: 食品乾燥機用シート
nl: Vellen voor voedsel drogen
no: Plater til mattørkere
pl: Siatki do suszarek do żywności
pt: Chapas para desidratar alimentos
ru: Листы для установок для сушки продуктов
sv: Plattor för matdehydrering
tr: Yiyecek Kurutucu Levhaları

en: Food Dehydrator Trays
xx: Food Dehydrator Trays
cs: Přihrádky do sušiček potravin
da: Tørreovn til mad – bakker
de: Dörrautomatentabletts
es: Bandejas para deshidratadores de alimentos
fr: Plateaux pour déshydrateurs alimentaires
it: Vassoi essiccazione cibo
ja: 食品乾燥機用トレー
nl: Bladen voor voedsel drogen
no: Brett til mattørkere
pl: Tacki do suszarek do żywności
pt: Bandejas para desidratar alimentos
ru: Поддоны для установок для сушки продуктов
sv: Brickor för matdehydrering
tr: Yiyecek Kurutucu Tepsileri

en: Food Grinder Accessories
xx: Food Grinder Accessories
cs: Mlýnky – příslušenství
da: Madkværn – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Lebensmittelmühlen
es: Accesorios para triturador de comida
fr: Accessoires pour broyeurs et hachoirs
it: Accessori tritatutto
ja: フードミル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor voedselvermalers
no: Tilbehør til matkverner
pl: Akcesoria do rozdrabniaczy do żywności
pt: Acessórios para moedor de alimentos
ru: Принадлежности для измельчителей пищевых продуктов
sv: Tillbehör till matkvarnar
tr: Yiyecek Öğütücü Aksesuarları

en: Food Mixer & Blender Accessories
xx: Food Mixer & Blender Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k mixérům a šlehačům
da: Tilbehør til køkkenmaskiner og blendere
de: Zubehör für Mixer & Pürierstäbe
es: Accesorios para batidoras y licuadoras
fr: Accessoires pour robots mixeurs et blenders
it: Accessori per mixer e frullatori
ja: フードミキサー・フードプロセッサー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor mixers en blenders
no: Tilbehør til miksere og blendere
pl: Akcesoria do mikserów i blenderów
pt: Acessórios para mixers e liquidificadores alimentícios
ru: Принадлежности для миксеров и блендеров
sv: Tillbehör till matmixrar och blenders
tr: Mikser ve Blender Aksesuarları

en: Freezer Accessories
xx: Freezer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k mrazákům
da: Tilbehør til frysere
de: Zubehör für Gefrierschränke
es: Accesorios para congeladores
fr: Accessoires pour congélateurs
it: Accessori per freezer
ja: 冷凍庫関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor diepvriezers
no: Tilbehør til frysere
pl: Akcesoria do zamrażarek
pt: Acessórios para freezer
ru: Принадлежности для морозильников
sv: Frystillbehör
tr: Dondurucu Aksesuarları

en: Garbage Disposal Accessories
xx: Garbage Disposal Accessories
cs: Likvidace odpadu – příslušenství
da: Affaldskværn – tilbehør
de: Küchenabfallzerkleinerer-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para la eliminación de basura
fr: Accessoires pour broyeurs d'évier
it: Accessori per lo smaltimento della spazzatura
ja: ディスポーザー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vuilnisbakken
no: Tilbehør til søppelkverner
pl: Akcesoria do usuwania odpadów
pt: Acessórios para eliminação de resíduos
ru: Принадлежности для утилизаторов отходов
sv: Tillbehör till avfallskvarnar
tr: Çöp Atma Aksesuarları

en: Ice Cream Maker Accessories
xx: Ice Cream Maker Accessories
cs: Zmrzlinovače – příslušenství
da: Ismaskine – tilbehør
de: Speiseeismaschinenzubehör
es: Accesorios para heladeras
fr: Accessoires pour sorbetières
it: Accessori macchina gelato
ja: アイスクリームメーカー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ijsmachines
no: Tilbehør til iskremmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do maszynek do lodów
pt: Acessórios para máquina de sorvete
ru: Принадлежности для морожениц
sv: Tillbehör till glassmaskiner
tr: Dondurma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Ice Cream Maker Freezer Bowls
xx: Ice Cream Maker Freezer Bowls
cs: Mrazicí misky do zmrzlinovačů
da: Ismaskine – fryseskåle
de: Gefrierschüsseln für Speiseeismaschinen
es: Cuencos de heladeras para frigorífico
fr: Bols de congélation pour sorbetières
it: Recipienti freezer macchina gelato
ja: フリーザーボウル
nl: Vriezerbakken voor ijsmachines
no: Fryseboller til iskremmaskiner
pl: Miski do mrożenia do maszynek do lodów
pt: Tigelas para freezer da máquina de sorvete
ru: Ёмкости для замораживания для морожениц
sv: Skålar till glassmaskiner
tr: Dondurma Makinesi Kapları